Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 11

Financial Institutions Conversion Act

45-11-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Institutions Conversion Act of 1985.”

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 9 provided that this chapter was remedial in nature and to be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose.

The “Financial Institutions Conversion Act of 1985” also included amendments to §§45-2-1302,45-2-1303,45-2-1304, and45-3-1102.

Cross-References. Volunteer corporate changes by banking institutions, title 45, ch. 2, part 13.

Volunteer corporate changes by savings and loan associations, title 45, ch. 3, part 11.

45-11-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Capital stock financial institution” means a financial institution, the ownership of which rests in the holders of shares of capital stock, who may receive dividends on their shares, and who have the sole right to vote on matters affecting the financial institution;

“Converting institution” means a financial institution converting to another type of financial institution;

“Financial institution” means a savings and loan association, bank, savings bank, credit union, or trust company organized under the laws of any state or organized under the laws of the United States;

“Mutual financial institution” means an association or savings bank or credit union, the ownership of which rests in members who receive interest on their deposit accounts, and who have the sole right to vote on all matters affecting the financial institution; and

“Resulting financial institution” means the financial institution resulting from a conversion and having its principal place of business in this state.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2; 1991, ch. 33, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 968, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 741, §§ 1, 2.

45-11-103. Scope.

This chapter shall not be construed to modify, limit or repeal the provisions of chapter 2, part 13 of this title, or chapter 3, part 11 of this title, except as expressly stated in this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2.

45-11-104. Conversion of charter.

Any financial institution may apply to the commissioner for permission to convert its charter in order to do business as another type of financial institution in accordance with the procedures prescribed in this chapter.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2.

45-11-105. Conversion procedure.

The board of directors of the converting institution shall, by a majority of the entire board, approve a plan of conversion that contains:

The type of financial institution that will result from the conversion;

The proposed name of the resulting institution;

The proposed effective date of conversion;

A copy of the proposed charter of the resulting institution;

A copy of the proposed bylaws of the resulting institution;

The method for converting the current capital structure of the institution to the structure indicated for the resulting institution by the proposed charter;

The name of each director and executive officer, the office held and the director's or officer's experience;

The method and schedule for terminating any activities and disposing of any assets that do not conform to the requirements of the resulting institution, and for meeting any requirements applicable to the resulting institution that the converting institution does not presently satisfy;

Any additional activities the converting institution intends to conduct immediately upon the effective date of the conversion that it does not presently conduct;

A copy of the application for deposit insurance or insurance of accounts;

Provisions for appointment of successors to any fiduciary positions held by the converting institution if the resulting institution will not exercise trust powers;

The competitive impact of the conversion, if any, including any effect on the availability of particular financial services in the community served by the institution;

A statement that the conversion is subject to approval by the commissioner and by the shareholders or members of the financial institution; and

Other provisions that the commissioner requires in order to discharge the commissioner's duties with respect to the conversion.

After approval by the board of directors of the converting financial institution, the plan of conversion shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval, together with a certified copy of the authorizing resolutions of the board of directors showing approval by a majority of the entire board.

The application for conversion pursuant to this chapter shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee in the amount established by regulation.

The commissioner shall approve the plan of conversion if it appears that:

The resulting financial institution meets the requirements of law applicable to the resulting institution;

The plan of conversion provides an adequate capital structure in relation to deposit liabilities of the resulting financial institution and its other activities that are to continue or are to be undertaken;

The officers and directors of the resulting institution have sufficient experience, ability, and standing to afford reasonable promise of successful operation;

The proposed name of the resulting institution is not deceptively similar to that of another institution;

The schedule for termination of any nonconforming activities and disposition of any nonconforming assets is timely, and the plan for termination and disposition does not include any unsafe or unsound practice;

The plan of conversion is fair;

The conversion is not contrary to the public interest; and

The resulting institution will be able to obtain federal deposit insurance.

The commissioner, if disapproving a plan of conversion, shall state any objections and give an opportunity to the converting institution to obviate the objections.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2; 1999, ch. 112, § 19; 2008, ch. 968, §§ 3, 4.

45-11-106. Approval by stockholders of converting financial institution.

To be effective, a plan of conversion for a stock-owned financial institution must be approved by the stockholders of the converting financial institution by a majority vote of the outstanding voting stock of each class at a meeting called to consider such action, which vote shall constitute the adoption of the charter and bylaws of the resulting financial institution.

To be effective, a plan of conversion for a mutually-owned financial institution must be approved by a majority vote of those members of the institution qualified to vote in person or by mail ballot at a meeting called to consider such action; provided, however, that a plan of conversion by a credit union shall be approved in accordance with the membership approval process for a federally insured credit union, to the extent such membership approval process is applicable.

Prior to mailing, notice of the meeting of shareholders or members and the proxy statement or mail ballot form shall be submitted to the commissioner for approval. The commissioner may require changes in the disclosures and the proxy or mail ballot provided to the stockholders or members to assure full and adequate disclosure prior to those documents being mailed to stockholders or members.

Notice of the meeting and other disclosures shall be mailed to each stockholder or member thirty (30) days prior to the date of the meeting called to consider the conversion.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2; 2008, ch. 968, § 5.

45-11-107. Effective date of conversion — Certificate of conversion.

The conversion shall, unless a later date is specified in the plan of conversion, become effective upon the filing with the commissioner of the executed plan of conversion, together with a copy of the resolution of the stockholders or members of the converting financial institution approving it, certified by the financial institution's president or a vice president and a cashier.

The commissioner shall thereupon approve the proposed charter of the resulting financial institution for filing with the secretary of state and issue to the resulting financial institution a certificate of conversion.

The certificate of conversion shall be issued after the following conditions have been met:

Provisions of the plan of conversion for successors to fiduciary positions held by the converting institution have been implemented; and

A commitment for federal deposit insurance effective as of the proposed effective date of conversion has been received.

The certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the conversion and correctness of all proceedings therefor in all courts and places, and shall be recorded in the same manner as is provided for recording of a charter of the institution.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2; 2008, ch. 968, § 6.

45-11-108. Continuation of corporate entity.

From and after the effective date of conversion, the resulting institution shall be deemed to be a continuation of the converting institution such that all property of the converting institution, including all right, title and interest in and to all property of whatsoever kind, whether real, personal or mixed, and things and action, and all rights, privileges and interests, and assets of any conceivable value or benefit that are then existing, or pertaining to it, or that would inure to it, shall immediately be vested in and continue to be the property of the resulting institution, by act of law and without any conveyance or transfer or without further act or deed; and the institution shall have, hold and enjoy the property in its own right as fully and to the same extent as the property that was possessed, held and enjoyed by the converting institution; and, as of the effective date of the conversion, the resulting institution shall have and shall succeed to all the rights, obligations and relations of the converting institution.

If the resulting institution is a savings and loan association or bank or a savings bank, it may continue to operate as branch offices all offices of the converting institution in existence or applications filed for branches pending approval by the appropriate authority. For the purpose of § 45-3-301 and chapter 2 of this title, the date chartered will be the date the converting institution was chartered prior to conversion.

Any pending action or other judicial proceeding to which the converting institution is a party shall not be deemed to have been abated or to have been discontinued by reason of the conversion but may be prosecuted to a final judgment, order or decree in the same manner as if the action had not been taken; and the institution resulting from the conversion may continue the action in its new name; and any judgment, order or decree may be rendered for or against it that might have been rendered for or against the converting institution previously involved in the judicial proceeding.

The resulting institution shall be liable for all obligations of the converting institution that existed prior to the action; and the action taken shall not prejudice the right of a creditor of the converting institution to have its debts paid out of the assets throughout, nor shall the creditor be deprived of, or prejudiced in, any action against the officers, directors, incorporators or members of the converting institution for neglect or misconduct.

Acts 1985, ch. 174, § 2; 1985, ch. 268, § 2; 1991, ch. 33, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Section 45-3-301, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1990, ch. 624, and new provisions were substituted therefor.

45-11-109. Fees, commissions or other forms of consideration prohibited.

A director, officer, committee member, agent or senior management employee of a credit union, and immediate family members of such individuals shall not, directly or indirectly, receive a fee, commission, or other consideration, other than that person's usual salary or compensation for aiding, promoting, or assisting in a conversion under this chapter.

Acts 2008, ch. 968, § 7.

45-11-110. Powers of commissioner — Rules and regulations.

The commissioner is granted the power to promulgate substantive and procedural rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2008, ch. 968, § 8.